Maryland, session 2026, HB1100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
17–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) (1) “Junk” or “scrap metal” includes:
(ii) the following used articles, made of either ferrous or nonferrous
metal:
8. cell tower batteries; [and]
9. TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT
TELECOMMUNICATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE AS DEFINED IN § 6–305.1 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
10. TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT THAT INCLUDES
ANY OTHER USED ARTICLES OWNED BY A TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY, AS
DEFINED IN § 6–305.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1100 3
A. ANTENNAE;
B. BURNED WIRES;
B. C. BUSBARS;
C. D. CELL TOWER BATTERIES;
E. FIBER OPTIC AND COPPER CABLES;
F. POWER INVERTERS; AND
D. G. MATERIALS WITH IDENTIFIABLE MARKERS THAT
INDICATE OWNERSHIP BY THE TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY; AND
H. SMALL CELL FACILITIES; AND
[9.] 10. 11. any other used articles owned by a public utility
including:
A. guardrails;
B. manhole covers;
C. metal light poles;
D. tree grates;
E. water meters; and
F. street signs.
(2) “Junk” or “scrap metal” does not include beverage cans or food cans.
17–1009.
(d) (1) A junk dealer or scrap metal processor may not barter, buy, exchange, or
accept from a person any junk or scrap metal unless the junk dealer or scrap metal processor
keeps records and makes entries in them in accordance with this subtitle.
(2) A junk dealer or scrap metal processor may not purchase a catalytic
converter from an individual unless the individual, at the time of purchase, provides
identification as:

HOUSE BILL 1100
(i) a licensed automotive dismantler and recycler or scrap metal
processor; or
(ii) an agent or employee of a licensed commercial enterprise.
(3) (I) A junk dealer or scrap metal processor may not purchase a
cemetery urn, grave marker, or any other item listed under § 17–1001(f)(1)(ii) of this subtitle
from an individual unless the individual, at the time of purchase, provides appropriate
authorization from a relevant business or unit of federal, State, or local government OR
FROM AN INDIVIDUAL WITH AUTHORIZATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH specifically authorizing the individual to conduct the transaction.
(II) FOR A PURCHASE OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT
SOLD AS JUNK OR SCRAP METAL, APPROPRIATE AUTHORIZATION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION INCLUDES A BILL OF SALE, RECEIPT, LETTER OF AUTHORIZATION, OR
OTHER DOCUMENTARY EVIDENCE THAT THE SELLER HAS LAWFUL AUTHORITY TO
SELL THE TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT.
(M) “TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT” MEANS AN ITEM THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW TO ORDINARILY BE USED BY,
OR BELONG TO, A TELEPHONE, TELEGRAPH, INTERNET, OR OTHER WIRELESS
COMMUNICATION COMPANY.
17–1010.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL JUNK DEALERS, SCRAP METAL
PROCESSORS, AND ANTIQUE DEALERS WHO ARE RESIDENTS OF THE STATE.
(B) (1) EACH JUNK DEALER, SCRAP METAL PROCESSOR, OR ANTIQUE
DEALER SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION WHO PURCHASES TELECOMMUNICATIONS
EQUIPMENT SHALL REGISTER WITH THE SHERIFF OR OTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICIAL DESIGNATED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE
BUSINESS OF THE JUNK DEALER, SCRAP METAL PROCESSOR, OR ANTIQUE DEALER
IS LOCATED A COMPLETE DESCRIPTION OF THE TELECOMMUNICATIONS
EQUIPMENT.
(2) THE DESCRIPTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE DATE AND TIME OF PURCHASE;
(II) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE SELLER; AND
(III) THE LICENSE TAG NUMBER OF ANY VEHICLE USED.

HOUSE BILL 1100 5
(C) A JUNK DEALER, SCRAP METAL PROCESSOR, OR ANTIQUE DEALER
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION WHO PURCHASES TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT
MAY PURCHASE TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT ONLY BY ISSUING A CHECK
THAT IS MAILED TO THE SELLER’S ADDRESS.
(D) TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT MAY NOT BE SOLD OR OTHERWISE
DISPOSED OF FOR A PERIOD OF 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF PURCHASE.
(E) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION:
(1) IS SUBJECT TO REVOCATION OF ANY STATE JUNK LICENSE HELD
BY THE PERSON; AND
(2) IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND, ON CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT
TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,000.
Article – Criminal Law
6–305.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY” MEANS A COMPANY THAT
PROVIDES BROADBAND INTERNET, CABLE TELEVISION, TELEPHONE, OR OTHER
WIRELESS COMMUNICATION SERVICES.
(3) (I) “TELECOMMUNICATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE” MEANS ITEMS
THAT ARE USED TO PROVIDE BROADBAND INTERNET, CABLE TELEVISION,
TELEPHONE, OR OTHER WIRELESS COMMUNICATION SERVICES.
(II) “TELECOMMUNICATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE” INCLUDES:
1. ANTENNAE;
2. FIBER OPTIC AND COPPER CABLES;
3. HEADENDS;
4. TELEPHONE POLES;
5. RADIO TRANSCEIVERS;

HOUSE BILL 1100
6. RADIO TOWERS;
7. WIRELESS SUPPORT STRUCTURES;
8. SMALL CELL FACILITIES; AND
9. TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY OFFICE
FACILITIES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) AN EMPLOYEE OF A TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY OR A
PERSON ACTING UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF A TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY;
OR
(2) SUPERVISION AND CONTROL OF A TELECOMMUNICATIONS
COMPANY AND ITS MATERIAL, EQUIPMENT, OR FACILITIES BY A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION WITHIN WHICH THE TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY IS DOING
BUSINESS.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT RECKLESSLY OR WILLFULLY AND MALICIOUSLY
DEFACE, DAMAGE, OR DESTROY TELECOMMUNICATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE.
(D) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 $500 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.